th: ความแข็ง/ความเหนียว: อ่อนมาก; แข็งปานกลาง; แข็ง; อ่อน; สปริง; อื่นๆ
sv: Härdning / hårdhet: Mycket mjukt; Halvhårt; Hårt; Mjukt; Fjäderhårt; Annat
vi: Độ cứng/độ tôi: Rất mềm; Bán cứng; Cứng; Mềm; Đàn hồi; Khác
it: Rigidità/durezza: Cotto; Crudo a metà; Crudo; Morbido; A molla; Altro
cs: Tvrdost: Extra měkké; Polotvrdé; Tvrdé; Měkké; Pružinové; Jiné
nl: Temper / hardheid: Zeer zacht; Halfhard; Hard; Zacht; Veerhard; Overig
sl-SI: Trdota/odpornost žice: Zelo mehko; Poltrdo; Trdo; Mehko; Vzmetno trdo; Drugo
ru: Закалка и твердость: Очень мягкий; Полутвёрдый; Твёрдый; Мягкий; Пружинный; Другое
pt-PT: Têmpera/dureza: Extra macio; Semiduro; Duro; Macio; Mola; Outro
tr: Sertlik / dayanıklılık: Tam yumuşak; Yarı sert; Sert; Yumuşak; Yaylık; Diğer
de: Härtegrad: Weichgeglüht; Halbhart; Hart; Weich; Federhart; Sonstige
hu: Keménység/lágyítás: Nagyon lágy; Félkemény; Kemény; Lágy; Rugókemény; Egyéb
ro-RO: Călire/duritate: Foarte moale; Semidur; Dur; Moale; Elasticitate de arc; Altele
pl: Stopień twardości: Bardzo miękki; Półtwardy; Twardy; Miękki; Sprężysty; Inny
ja: 焼き戻し/硬度: デッドソフト; ハーフハード; ハード; ソフト; スプリング; その他
bg-BG: Закалка / твърдост: Много мека; Полутвърда; Твърда; Мека; Пружинна; Друго
en: Temper / hardness: Dead soft; Half-hard; Hard; Soft; Spring; Other
es: Temple / dureza: Muy blando; Semiduro; Duro; Blando; Resorte; Otro
fi: Karkaisuaste / kovuus: Täysin pehmeä; Puolikova; Kova; Pehmeä; Jousikova; Muu
zh-TW: 回火/硬度: 極軟; 半硬; 硬; 軟; 彈簧硬度; 其他
ko: 경도/강성: 데드 소프트; 하프 하드; 하드; 소프트; 스프링; 기타
zh-CN: 回火/硬度: 全软; 半硬; 硬; 软; 弹簧; 其他
el: Σκληρότητα: Πολύ μαλακό; Ημίσκληρο; Σκληρό; Μαλακό; Ελατηριωτό; Άλλο
fr: Trempe/dureté: Très malléable; Demi-dur; Dur; Malléable; À ressort; Autre
pt-BR: Têmpera/dureza: Totalmente macio; Semirrígido; Rígido; Macio; Mola; Outro
lt-LT: Kietumas: Visiškai minkštas; Pusiau kietas; Kietas; Minkštas; Spyruoklinis; Kita
hr-HR: Temperatura / tvrdoća: Vrlo mekano; Polutvrdo; Tvrdo; Mekano; Opružno; Ostalo
da: Temperering eller hårdhed: Helt blød; Halvhård; Hård; Blød; Fjederhård; Andet
sk-SK: Temper/tvrdosť: Úplne mäkký; Polotvrdý; Tvrdý; Mäkký; Pružinový; Iné
nb: Herding/hardhet: Helt myk; Halvhard; Hard; Myk; Fjærende; Annet